reconstruct/toy/ie-test.foma
define IeV [o:o | e:e | i:i | u:u];
define IeC [p:p | t:t | k:k | s:s];
define Syllable [[IeC | 0] IeV];
define Word Syllable+;

define kePalatalization k e -> c e;
define eo⇒a [e | o -> a];
define IEtoSkt [Word .o. kePalatalization .o. eo⇒a];
push IEtoSkt
save stack skt.bin
pop

define V [a | e | i | o | u | y];
define C [? - V];

define s⇒h s -> h;
define DeleteInternalH [h -> 0 || V _ V];
define u⇒y u -> y;
define AspirateInitialY [y -> h y || .#. _];
define IEtoGrk [Word .o. s⇒h .o. DeleteInternalH .o. u⇒y .o. AspirateInitialY];
push IEtoGrk
save stack grk.bin
pop

quit
